Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-1659
Removal, breach, or abandonment of dam; design engineer; duties; Chief Water Officer; powers.

(1) Upon completion of the removal, breach, or abandonment of a dam, the design engineer shall file with the Chief Water Officer a completion certification.

(2) Before final approval of the removal of a dam is issued, the Chief Water Officer may inspect the site of the work and determine that all work was accomplished in substantial conformance with the application approval.

(3) Following the removal of a dam, the Chief Water Officer may report such removal to the National Performance of Dams Program and to the National Inventory of Dams.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 59;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 297.